Utah statutes.
76-8-805.   Conspiracy to commit crimes of sabotage.

If two or more persons conspire to commit any crime defined by this part each of the persons is guilty of conspiracy and subject to the same punishment as if he had committed the crime which he conspired to commit, whether or not any act be done in furtherance of the conspiracy. It shall not constitute any defense or ground of suspension of judgment, sentence, or punishment on behalf of any person prosecuted under this section that any of his fellow conspirators has been acquitted, has not been arrested or convicted, or is amenable to justice or has been pardoned or otherwise discharged before or after conviction.

